North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 1. Preliminary Provisions.

§ 59-31.
North Carolina Uniform Partnership Act.

Articles 2 through 4A, inclusive, of this Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the North Carolina Uniform Partnership Act.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 101(j); 2001-487, s. 20.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, see 19 N.C.L. Rev. 499 (1941).

For note on partnerships in bankruptcy, see 31 N.C.L. Rev. 457 (1953).

For discussion of partnerships as legal vehicles for historic preservation, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 9 (1976).

For note on the presumption of a wife’s gratuitous services, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 235 (1980).

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-32.
Definition of terms.

As used in this Chapter, except as otherwise defined in Article 5 of this Chapter for purposes of that Article, the following definitions apply:

Act. — The North Carolina Uniform Partnership Act and refers to all provisions therein.

(1a)

Bankrupt. — Bankrupt under the Federal Bankruptcy Act or insolvent under any State insolvent act.

Business. — Every trade, occupation, or profession.

Conveyance. — Every assignment, lease, mortgage, or encumbrance.

Court. — Every court and judge having jurisdiction in the case.

(4a)

Domestic corporation. — Has the same meaning as in

G.S. 55-1-40

.

(4b)

Domestic limited liability company. — Has the same meaning as the term “LLC” in

G.S. 57D-1-03

.

(4c)

Domestic limited partnership. — Has the same meaning as in

G.S. 59-102

.

(4d)

Domestic nonprofit corporation. — A corporation as defined in

G.S. 55A-1-40

.

(4e)

Foreign corporation. — Has the same meaning as in

G.S. 55-1-40

.

(4f)

Foreign limited liability company. — Has the same meaning as the term “foreign LLC” in

G.S. 57D-1-03

.

(4g)

Foreign limited liability partnership. — A partnership that is formed under laws other than the laws of this State and has the status of a limited liability partnership or registered limited liability partnership under those laws.

(4h)

Foreign limited partnership. — Has the same meaning as in

G.S. 59-102

.

(4i)

Foreign nonprofit corporation. — A foreign corporation as defined in

G.S. 55A-1-40

.

Person. — Individuals, partnerships, corporations, limited liability companies, and other associations.

(5a)

Principal office. — The office (in or out of this State) where the principal executive offices of a registered limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability partnership are located, as designated in its most recent annual report filed with the Secretary of State or, if no annual report has yet been filed, in its application for registration as a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership.

Real property. — Land and any interest or estate in land.

Registered limited liability partnership. — A partnership that is registered under

G.S. 59-84.2

and complies with

G.S. 59-84.3

.

Service-disabled veteran. — A veteran with a disability that was incurred or aggravated during the veteran’s service in the Armed Forces of the United States.

Service-disabled veteran-owned small business. — A business that satisfies all of the following requirements:

The business’s net annual receipts do not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

One or more service-disabled veterans own more than fifty percent (50%) of the business.

Veteran. — An individual entitled to any benefits or rights under the laws of the United States by reason of service in the Armed Forces of the United States.

Veteran-owned small business. — A business that satisfies all of the following requirements:

The business’s net annual receipts do not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

One or more veterans own more than fifty percent (50%) of the business.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 2; 1993, c. 354, s. 3; 1999-362, s. 4; 2000-140, s. 101(k); 2001-387, s. 103; 2013-157, s. 15; 2017-90, s. 5; 2018-142, s. 11.

§ 59-33.
Interpretation of knowledge and notice.

A person has “knowledge” of a fact within the meaning of this Act not only when he has actual knowledge thereof, but also when he has knowledge of such other facts as in the circumstances show bad faith.

A person has “notice” of a fact within the meaning of this Act when the person who claims the benefit of the notice:

States the fact to such person, or

Delivers through the mail, or by other means of communication a written statement of the fact to such person or to a proper person at his place of business or residence.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 3; 2000-140, s. 101(n).

§ 59-34.
Rules of construction.

The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this Act.

The law of estoppel shall apply under this Act.

The law of agency shall apply under this Act.

This Article shall be so interpreted and construed as to effect its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

This Article and the other provisions of this Act shall not be construed so as to impair the obligations of any contract existing when the Article or any other provision of this Act, as applicable, goes into effect, nor to affect any action or proceedings begun or right accrued before this Article or any other provision of this Act, as applicable, takes effect.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 4; 2000-140, s. 101(l).

§ 59-35.
Rules for cases not provided for in this Act.

In any case not provided for in this Act, the rules of law and equity, including the law merchant, shall govern.

History.

1941, c. 374, s. 5; 2000-140, s. 101(m).

§ 59-35.1.
Filing of documents.

A document required or permitted by this Act to be filed by the Secretary of State must be filed under Chapter 55D of the General Statutes.

A document submitted for filing by the Secretary of State on behalf of a general partnership must be executed by a general partner of the partnership.

The Secretary of State may adopt and furnish on request forms for:

An application for registration as a registered limited liability partnership;

Cancellation of registration as a registered limited liability partnership;

Application for registration as a foreign limited liability partnership; and

Cancellation of registration as a foreign limited liability partnership.If the Secretary of State so requires, use of these forms is mandatory.

The Secretary of State may adopt and furnish on request forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by this Act, but their use is not mandatory.

History.

1999-369, s. 4.1; 2001-358, ss. 9, 38, 51(c); 2001-387, ss. 104, 105(c), 155, 170(a), 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2002-58, s. 4.

§ 59-35.2.
Filing, service, and copying fees.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection are submitted by a partnership to the Secretary of State for filing:

Click to view

Whenever the Secretary of State is deemed appointed as a registered agent under this Act or under Chapter 55D of the General Statutes, the Secretary of State shall collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) each time process is served on the Secretary of State under this Act. The party to the proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees for copying, comparing, and certifying a copy of a filed partnership document:

One dollar ($1.00) a page for copying or comparing a copy to the original.

Fifteen dollars ($15.00) for a paper certificate.

Ten dollars ($10.00) for an electronic certificate.

Document Fee (1) Application for reserved name $10.00 (2) Notice of transfer of reserved name 10.00 (3) Application for registered name 10.00 (4) Application for renewal of registered name 10.00 (5) Registered limited liability partnership’s or foreign limited liability partnership’s statement of change of registered agent or registered office or both 5.00 (6) Agent’s statement of change of registered office for each affected registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership 5.00 (7) Agent’s statement of resignation No Fee (8) Designation of registered agent or registered office or both 5.00 (9) Articles of conversion (other than articles of conversion in- cluded as part of another document) 50.00 (10) Articles of merger 50.00 (11) Application for registration as a registered limited liability partnership 125.00 (12) Certificate of amendment of registration as a registered limited liability partnership 25.00 (13) Cancellation of registration as a registered limited liability partnership 25.00 (14) Application for registration as a foreign limited liability partnership 125.00 (15) Certificate of amendment of registration as a foreign limited liability partnership 25.00 (16) Cancellation of registration as a foreign limited liability partnership 25.00 (17) Application for certificate of withdrawal by reason of merger, consolidation, or conversion. 10.00 (18) Annual report 200.00 (19) Articles of correction 10.00 (20) Any other document required or permitted to be filed pur- suant to this Act 10.00

History.

2001-387, s. 170(b); 2001-487, s. 62(q); 2005-435, s. 46.